Hawaii, session 2026, SB2841.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 28, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part XIII to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§28-    Human trafficking awareness training program; transient accommodations sector.  (a)  No later than July 1, 2027, the department of the attorney general shall develop a human trafficking awareness training program for the purpose of educating and training workers in the transient accommodations sector. The training program shall include but not be limited to the following components: (1)  Definitions of human trafficking and the commercial exploitation of children; (2)  Explanation of the differences between labor trafficking and sex trafficking, as they relate to the transient accommodations sector; (3)  Guidance on indicators of human trafficking, including identifying: (A)  Individuals who may be vulnerable to or victims of human trafficking; and (B)  Individuals who may be engaged in human trafficking activity; (5)  Guidance on the appropriate response and reporting procedures for transient accommodations workers when indicators of human trafficking are observed; and (6)  Contact information for: (A)  The National Human Trafficking Hotline toll‑free number and text line; and (B)  Appropriate local law enforcement agencies. (b)  Training programs developed externally may be used within the transient accommodations sector; provided that the programs comply with subsection (a)(1) through (6) and are approved by the department of the attorney general.  The department of the attorney general shall review externally developed training programs and approve or disapprove of the program's use no later than sixty days following written receipt of the program. (c)  For the purposes of this section, "transient accommodations" has the same meaning as defined in section 237D‑1." SECTION 2.  Chapter 353C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§353C-    Human trafficking awareness; transient accommodations sector; training; records; signage; reporting; penalties.  (a)  Every transient accommodations employer and transient accommodations third-party contractor shall take and provide human trafficking awareness training developed pursuant to section 28-   to its employees and contract workers, as applicable, within one hundred eighty days of employment or placement, as applicable, and at least every two years thereafter. (b)  Each transient accommodations employer and transient accommodations third-party contractor providing human trafficking awareness training under this section shall maintain records documenting the completion of the required training by its employees and contract workers, as applicable, pursuant to rules adopted by the department.  The director or the director's authorized representative shall, for the purpose of examination, have access to and the right to copy the records.  Every transient accommodations employer and transient accommodations third-party contractor shall furnish to the director or the director's authorized representative any information relating to the training of employees and contract workers pursuant to this section in any manner as the director may prescribe. (c)  No later than January 1, 2028, every transient accommodations employer and transient accommodations third-party contractor shall post and keep posted in a conspicuous place readily accessible to its employees and contract workers, as applicable, signage regarding human trafficking awareness in a form prescribed by the department by rule; provided that the signage shall be printed in an easily legible font in English and any other language spoken by at least ten per cent of its employees and contract workers. (d)  No later than October 1, 2027, every transient accommodations employer and transient accommodations third-party contractor shall develop and implement a human trafficking prevention policy that shall: (1)  Apply to all of its individuals in employ and contract workers, as applicable; and (2)  Include procedures for the reporting of suspected human trafficking to the National Human Trafficking Hotline or to a local law enforcement agency. (e)  A transient accommodations employer, transient accommodations third-party contractor, or the employer's or contractor's employee or contract worker who in good faith complies with this section or reports suspected human trafficking pursuant to policies adopted pursuant this section shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability for any act or omission arising out of or related to human trafficking committed by a third party, unless the employer, employee, or worker knowingly assists in the commission of human trafficking. (f)  Any transient accommodations employer or transient accommodations third-party contractor who violates this section shall be fined not more than $100 for each separate offense.  Each day the violation continues shall constitute a separate offense. Any action taken to impose or collect the penalty provided for in this subsection shall be considered a civil action. (g)  The department shall, in consultation with the department of the attorney general, adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. (h)  For purposes of this section: "Contract worker" means an individual employed by a transient accommodations third-party contractor who, pursuant to a contract for services with a transient accommodations employer, has contact with guests or access to guest rooms of the transient accommodations. "Employee" means an individual employed by a transient accommodations employer who has contact with guests or access to guest rooms of the transient accommodations. "Transient accommodations" has the same meaning as defined in section 237D-1. "Transient accommodations employer" means an employer that owns, operates, manages, or controls transient accommodations located in the State, and: (1)  Employs one or more employees; or (2)  Contracts with a transient accommodations third‑party contractor for the services of one or more contract workers. "Transient accommodations third-party contractor" means any person who, for a fee or other valuable consideration exacted, charged, or received, furnishes or supplies contract workers for placement with a transient accommodations employers upon request." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval.